Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1924.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SHORT TITLE.new text end new text begin This act may be cited as the "A+ Energy Act." new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.01, is amended to read: 216B.01 LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. new text begin It is the policy of this state to preserve a safe, reliable, and affordable energy system that facilitates the use of all available energy options. new text end It is hereby declared to be in the public interest that public utilities be regulated as hereinafter provided in order to provide the retail consumers of natural gas and electric service in this state with adequate and reliable services at reasonable rates, consistent with the financial and economic requirements of public utilities and their need to construct facilities to provide such services or to otherwise obtain energy supplies, to avoid unnecessary duplication of facilities which increase the cost of service to the consumer and to minimize disputes between public utilities which may result in inconvenience or diminish efficiency in service to the consumers. Because municipal utilities are presently effectively regulated by the residents of the municipalities which own and operate them, and cooperative electric associations are presently effectively regulated and controlled by the membership under the provisions of chapter 308A, it is deemed unnecessary to subject such utilities to regulation under this chapter except as specifically provided herein. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.1691, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meaning given them. (b) "Carbon-free" means a technology that generates electricity without emitting carbon dioxide. (c) Unless otherwise specified in law, "eligible energy technology" means an energy technology that generates electricity from the following renewable energy sources: (1) solar; (2) wind; (3) hydroelectric deleted text begin with a capacity of: (i) less than 100 megawatts; or (ii) 100 megawatts or more, provided that the facility is in operation as of February 8, 2023deleted text end ; (4) hydrogen generated from the resources listed in this paragraph; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (5) biomass, which includes, without limitation, landfill gas; an anaerobic digester system; the predominantly organic components of wastewater effluent, sludge, or related by-products from publicly owned treatment works, but not including incineration of wastewater sludge to produce electricity; and, except as provided in subdivision 1a, an energy recovery facility used to capture the heat value of mixed municipal solid waste or refuse-derived fuel from mixed municipal solid waste as a primary fueldeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (6) nuclear. new text end (d) "Electric utility" means: (1) a public utility providing electric service; (2) a generation and transmission cooperative electric association; (3) a municipal power agency; (4) a power district; or (5) a cooperative electric association or municipal utility providing electric service that is not a member of an entity in clauses (2) to (4). (e) "Environmental justice area" means an area in Minnesota that, based on the most recent data published by the United States Census Bureau, meets one or more of the following criteria: (1) 40 percent or more of the area's total population is nonwhite; (2) 35 percent or more of households in the area have an income that is at or below 200 percent of the federal poverty level; (3) 40 percent or more of the area's residents over the age of five have limited English proficiency; or (4) the area is located within Indian country, as defined in United State Code, title 18, section 1151. (f) "Total retail electric sales" means the kilowatt-hours of electricity sold in a year by an electric utility to retail customers of the electric utility or to a distribution utility for distribution to the retail customers of the distribution utility. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.1691, subdivision 2e, is amended to read: Subd. 2e. Rate impact of standard compliance; report. new text begin (a) new text end Each electric utility must submit to the commission and the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over energy policy a report containing an estimation of the rate impact of activities of the electric utility necessary to comply with this section. In consultation with the Department of Commerce, the commission shall determine a uniform reporting system to ensure that individual utility reports are consistent and comparable, and shall, by order, require each electric utility subject to this section to use that reporting system. The rate impact estimate must be for wholesale rates and, if the electric utility makes retail sales, the estimate shall also be for the impact on the electric utility's retail rates. Those activities include, without limitation, energy purchases, generation facility acquisition and construction, and transmission improvements. A report must be updated and submitted as part of each integrated resource plan or plan modification filed by the electric utility under section 216B.2422. The reporting obligation of an electric utility under this subdivision expires December 31, 2040. new text begin (b) A report submitted under this subdivision must include an explanation detailing the electric utility's efforts to reduce carbon dioxide emissions and increase the use of renewable energy in the electric utility's operations in a manner that does not adversely affect customer costs or the reliability of electric service to Minnesotans. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.243, subdivision 3b, is amended to read: Subd. 3b. Nuclear power plant; deleted text begin new construction prohibited;deleted text end relicensing. deleted text begin (a) The commission may not issue a certificate of need for the construction of a new nuclear-powered electric generating plant. deleted text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end Any certificate of need for additional storage of spent nuclear fuel for a facility seeking a license extension shall address the impacts of continued operations over the period for which approval is sought. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.243, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Exemptions. (a) This section does not apply to: (1) cogeneration or small power production facilities as defined in the Federal Power Act, United States Code, title 16, section 796, paragraph (17), subparagraph (A), and paragraph (18), subparagraph (A), and having a combined capacity at a single site of less than 80,000 kilowatts; plants or facilities for the production of ethanol or fuel alcohol; or any case where the commission has determined after being advised by the attorney general that its application has been preempted by federal law; (2) a high-voltage transmission line proposed primarily to distribute electricity to serve the demand of a single customer at a single location, unless the applicant opts to request that the commission determine need under this section or section 216B.2425; (3) the upgrade to a higher voltage of an existing transmission line that serves the demand of a single customer that primarily uses existing rights-of-way, unless the applicant opts to request that the commission determine need under this section or section 216B.2425; (4) a high-voltage transmission line of one mile or less required to connect a new or upgraded substation to an existing, new, or upgraded high-voltage transmission line; (5) conversion of the fuel source of an existing electric generating plant to using natural gas; (6) the modification of an existing electric generating plant to increase efficiency, as long as the capacity of the plant is not increased more than ten percent or more than 100 megawatts, whichever is greater; (7) a large wind energy conversion system, as defined in section 216I.02, subdivision 12, or a solar energy generating system, as defined in section 216I.02, subdivision 18, for which a site permit application is submitted by an independent power producer under chapter 216I; (8) a large wind energy conversion system, as defined in section 216I.02, subdivision 12, or a solar energy generating system, as defined in section 216I.02, subdivision 18, engaging in a repowering project that: (i) will not result in the system exceeding the nameplate capacity under its most recent interconnection agreement; or (ii) will result in the system exceeding the nameplate capacity under its most recent interconnection agreement, provided that the Midcontinent Independent System Operator has provided a signed generator interconnection agreement that reflects the expected net power increase; (9) energy storage systems, as defined in section 216I.02, subdivision 6; (10) transmission lines that directly interconnect large wind energy conversion systems, solar energy generating systems, or energy storage systems to the transmission system; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (11) relocation of an existing high voltage transmission line to new right-of-way, provided that any new structures that are installed are not designed for and capable of operation at higher voltagedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (12) a nuclear-powered electric generating plant; new text end new text begin (13) a hydroelectric generating facility; or new text end new text begin (14) a biomass electric generating facility. new text end (b) For the purpose of this subdivision, "repowering project" means: (1) modifying a large wind energy conversion system or a solar energy generating system that is a large energy facility to increase its efficiency without increasing its nameplate capacity; (2) replacing turbines in a large wind energy conversion system without increasing the nameplate capacity of the system; or (3) increasing the nameplate capacity of a large wind energy conversion system. new text begin (c) The exemptions under paragraph (a), clauses (12) to (14), do not apply if the commission determines that the exemption is not in the public interest. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to a large wind energy conversion system, a solar energy generating system, a nuclear-powered electric generating plant, a hydroelectric generating facility, or a biomass electric generating facility whose owner has filed an application for a certificate of need with the Public Utilities Commission on or after that date. new text end